Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 15.8 Mutual Aid Agreement with Bordering States

30-15.8-1.
Authority of governor.

The governor may enter into an agreement with any state bordering Rhode Island or with any office or agency of that state pledging to the state of Rhode Island participation in a mutual aid plan in the event of a disaster.

The mutual agreement entered into by the state of Rhode Island and any other border state shall be activated only when the governor has declared a disaster to exist under the laws of this state, or the president of the United States, at the request of the governor, has declared a major disaster or emergency to exist in this state or the border state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 7.

30-15.8-2.
Rules and regulations.

The governor is authorized to make such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the intent of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 165, § 1.

30-15.8-3.
City or town aid agreement.

The police chief of a city or town in Rhode Island may enter into an agreement, which is subject to approval by each city or town council by adoption of a resolution in support of it with another city or town, which is adjacent to and borders on the state of Rhode Island, to provide mutual aid and assistance for all police services prescribed by law within any portion of the jurisdiction of the city or town of the chief granting the authority.

The officers responding to the request and agreement shall have the same authority, powers, duties, privileges and immunities for jurisdictional purposes as a duly appointed police officer of the city or town making the request.

All wage and disability payments, pension, workers’ compensation claims, medical expenses or other employment benefits will be the responsibility of the employing agency, unless the requesting agency is reimbursed for such costs from any other source. Each agency shall be responsible for the negligence of its employees to the extent specified by law.

A copy of any agreement entered into pursuant to this section shall be provided to the superintendent of the Rhode Island state police.

The governor shall have the authority to suspend an agreement entered into pursuant to this section upon a finding that the suspension is in the interest of public safety.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 142, § 2.